North Carolina, session 2025, SB868.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), shall amend the North Carolina Innovations waiver to increase the number of
waiver slots available under the waiver by 1,000 slots. These 1,000 additional slots shall be made
available on July 1, 2026, or as soon as practicable after that date.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of thirty-six million
two hundred thousand dollars ($36,200,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts beginning
with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to fund these additional slots.
SECTION 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
*S868-v-1*